Washington statutes.
RCW 18.145.040

Exemptions.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits or restricts:

(1) The practice of court reporting by individuals who are licensed, certified, or registered as court reporters under other laws of this state and who are performing services within their authorized scope of practice;

(2) The practice of court reporting by an individual employed by the government of the United States while the individual is performing duties prescribed by the laws and regulations of the United States; or

(3) The introduction of alternate technology in court reporting practice.

[ 1995 c 27 s 5; 1989 c 382 s 5.]